Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1508
Grantor and grantee index.

The register of deeds shall keep a grantor and a grantee index of deeds in his or her office. If such index is in book form, the pages shall be divided into eight columns as follows:

GRANTOR INDEXGRANTEE INDEXGrantorsGranteesGranteesGrantorsDate of Filing Date of Filing Date of InstrumentDate of InstrumentCharacter of InstrumentCharacter of InstrumentBook BookPage PageDescription of Tract Description of Tract

Laws 1885, c. 41, § 4, p. 221;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 6, p. 365;

R.S.1913, § 5623;

C.S.1922, § 4950;

C.S.1929, § 26-1208;

R.S.1943, § 23-1508;

Laws 1984, LB 679, § 5.

This statute is a check on numerical index statute to insure accuracy in ascertaining state of records as to titles to real estate. Crook v. Chilvers, 99 Neb. 684, 157 N.W. 617 (1916).